Wyoming statutes. Title 13 Banks, Banking and Finance
Article 6. Conservatorship

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

10 Am. Jur. 2d Banks and Financial Institutions § 1073.

9 C.J.S. Banks and Banking §§ 597 to 598.

§ 13-4-601.
Appointment; duty of commissioner.

The state banking commissioner may appoint a conservator for a bank in order to conserve the assets of the bank for depositors and creditors. He may require a sufficient bond and security of the conservator. The conservator shall receive a fixed salary in an amount to be determined by the state banking commissioner.

The conservator shall take possession of all assets of the bank and take action necessary to conserve the assets of the bank. The conservator may employ help necessary to perform his duties. The rights of all parties with respect to a bank in the possession of a conservator shall be the same as if the state banking commissioner had possession of the bank. All expenses of conservatorship shall be paid out of the assets of the bank and shall be a lien on the bank which is prior to any other liens.

The state banking commissioner shall examine the affairs of banks under conservatorship as necessary to keep him informed of the financial condition of the bank.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, §§ 2, 3; C.S. 1945, §§ 35-702, 35-703; W.S. 1957, §§ 13-177, 13-178; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

Preferred payment. —

Statute providing that checks, drafts or other negotiable instruments issued by collecting bank in exchange for notes, bonds or other obligations deposited for collection were entitled to preferred payment upon insolvency of bank did not create preferred claim where there was no valid claim. In re Riverton State Bank, 47 Wyo. 469, 38 P.2d 603,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 32

(Wyo. 1934), modified, 48 Wyo. 372, 49 P.2d 637,

1935 Wyo. LEXIS 44

(Wyo. 1935).

§ 13-4-602.
Withdrawal and deposits.

The state banking commissioner may require a conservator of a bank to make available for withdrawal by depositors and payment on a ratable basis to other creditors amounts that may safely be used for this purpose.

The state banking commissioner may permit the conservator to receive deposits. Deposits received while the bank is in the hands of the conservator shall not be subject to any limitation as to payment or withdrawal, shall be segregated and shall not be used to liquidate any existing indebtedness of the bank or any subsequent indebtedness incurred for the purpose of liquidating any existing indebtedness. Deposits received while the bank is in the hands of the conservator shall be kept on hand in cash, invested in the direct obligations of the United States, or deposited with a federal reserve bank or a bank within the state approved by the state banking commissioner.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 5; C.S. 1945, § 35-705; W.S. 1957, § 13-180; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-4-603.
Termination; authority of commissioner.

The state banking commissioner may terminate the conservatorship and permit the bank to resume the transaction of its business subject to limitations which he may prescribe in the public interest.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 4; C.S. 1945, § 35-704; W.S. 1957, § 13-179; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1; 1991, ch. 240, § 1.

§ 13-4-604.
Termination; effect on payments and notice.

Fifteen (15) days after the affairs of a bank have been turned back to its board of directors by the conservator the provisions of W.S.

13-4-602

shall no longer be effective.

Before the conservator turns back the affairs of the bank to its board of directors he shall give notice in a newspaper of general circulation in the community in which the bank is located. The notice shall state the date on which the affairs of the bank will be returned to its board of directors and that the provisions of W.S.

13-4-602

will not be effective fifteen (15) days after that date. On the date of the publication of the notice, the conservator shall send to every depositor under W.S.

13-4-602

a copy of the notice by registered mail addressed to his last known address on the records of the bank and a notice to every person making a deposit in the bank under W.S. 13-4-602 after the date of the newspaper publication and before the affairs of the bank are returned to its directors.

History.

Laws 1933, Sp. Sess., ch. 4, § 7; C.S. 1945, § 35-707; W.S. 1957, § 13-182; Laws 1977, ch. 67, § 1.